Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2304
Articles of incorporation; contents.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth: (1) The names and residences of the applicants together with a recital that each of them is an elector of and taxpayer in the local political subdivision, (2) the name of the corporation, (3) a recital that permission to organize the corporation has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the local political subdivision and the date of the adoption of the resolution, (4) the location of the registered office of the corporation, which shall be in the local political subdivision, and the name of its current registered agent at such office, (5) the purposes for which the corporation is organized, (6) the number of directors of the corporation, (7) the period, if any, of duration of the corporation, and (8) any other matter which the applicants choose to insert in the articles of incorporation which is not inconsistent with the Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act or with the laws of this state. The articles of incorporation shall be subscribed and acknowledged before a notary public by each of the applicants.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB379, § 21.